Massachusetts, session 194th, S1063.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
SECTION 1. Section 1 of chapter 258B, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition, is 
hereby amended by inserting after the word “stepparent” in line 16 the following word:- 
grandparent,  
SECTION 2. Said Section 1 of said chapter 258B, as so appearing, is hereby further 
amended by inserting after the words “two hundred and fifty-eight C” in line 17 the following 
words:- person with whom the victim lived and in a relationship similar to marriage,  
SECTION 3. Said Section 1 of said chapter 258B, as so appearing, is hereby further 
amended by inserting, after line 18, the following words:-  
“probation officer”, an associate probation officer, probation officer, assistant chief 
probation officer, chief probation officer, regional probation supervisor, statewide probation 

of 6 11 supervisor, victim service coordinator, the deputy commissioner of field services, and any other 
personnel whom the commissioner of probation shall direct.  
“limited English proficient”, individuals who do not speak English as their primary 
language and have a limited ability to speak, read, write, or understand English.  
“vital document”, paper or electronic written material that contains information that is 
critical for accessing a component’s programs or activities or is required by law.  
SECTION 4. Section 2 of said chapter 258B, as so appearing, is hereby amended by 
inserting at the beginning the following:-  
Services provided in this chapter shall be afforded to victims and family members of 
violent crimes, including homicide and sexual assault, to the fullest extent possible in matters 
that have not resulted in complaints or indictments have not been issued.  
SECTION 5. Said Section 2 of said chapter 258B, as so appearing, is hereby amended by 
inserting before the word “prosecutors” in line 1 the following word:-  
Furthermore,  
SECTION 6. Subsection (l) of Section 3 of said chapter 258B, as so appearing, is hereby 
amended by striking the word “A” in line 91 and inserting, in place thereof, the following word:- 
B  
SECTION 7. Said section 3 of said chapter 258B, as so appearing, is hereby amended by 
striking out subsection (p) and inserting in place thereof the following subsection:-  

of 6 30  (p) for victims, to be present and heard at sentencing or the disposition of the case against 
the defendant.  In any court proceeding not previously scheduled for an admission to sufficient 
facts or change of the defendant’s plea, if a victim is not present at the time the defendant pleads 
or is found guilty, delinquent, or admits to sufficient facts, the court shall delay sentencing by no 
less than one business day.  Upon such continuance, the district attorney pursuant to section four 
B of chapter two hundred and seventy-nine shall provide or make attempts to provide to the 
victim or victims actual notice of the time and place of the disposition to afford the victims the 
opportunity to be present and or heard.  The court may waive the delay upon a showing by the 
prosecutor that the victim does not desire to be present or heard at sentencing.  Victims have the 
right to be heard through an oral and written victim impact statement at sentencing or the 
disposition of the case against the defendant, even if there is admission to sufficient facts, the 
sentence is mandatory, or there is an agreed upon plea, about the effects of the crime on the 
victim and as to a recommended sentence, pursuant to section four B of chapter two hundred and 
seventy-nine, and to be heard at any other time deemed appropriate by the court. The court shall 
consider said victim impact statement in disposition of the case against the defendant.  The 
victim also has a right to submit the victim impact statement to the parole board for inclusion in 
its records regarding the perpetrator of the crime;  
SECTION 8. Subsection (t) of said section 3 of said chapter 258B, as so appearing, is 
hereby amended by inserting after the word “custody” in line 144 the following words:- 
including a release on bail,  
SECTION 9. Said section 3 of said chapter 258B, as so appearing, is hereby amended by 
inserting the following sections:-  

of 6 52  (x) for victims, to be notified by the prosecutor that they have the right to provide the sex 
offender registry board with a written impact statement for inclusion in the convicted sex 
offender’s classification determination pursuant to section 178K(1)(k) of chapter 6.  
(y) for victims, to be notified by the probation officer if an offender has a violation of 
probation hearing, any sentencing after a finding of a violation of probation, and any motion to 
modify the sentence or disposition of probation, including a transfer of supervision or a motion 
to terminate. Victims requesting such notice must provide the probation service with current 
contact information.  
(z) for victims, to be heard through an oral or written statement after a finding of a 
violation of probation, and any motion to modify the sentence or disposition, including a motion 
to terminate.  
(aa) for victims, who may be limited English proficient, to include and not be limited to 
victims and witnesses who identify as deaf or hard of hearing, the right to receive free oral or 
sign language services and assistance that provides for the meaningful enforcement of rights 
under this chapter. 
SECTION 10. Section 7 of said chapter 258B, as so appearing, is hereby amended by 
inserting after the words “district attorney,” in line 1 the following words:- probation service, 
parole board, sex offender registry board, department of correction, department of youth 
services, sheriffs,  
SECTION 11. The first sentence of section 4B of chapter 279, as appearing in the 2022 
Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking the words “against the person or crime where 
physical injury to a person results, excluding any crime for which a sentence of death may be 

of 6 74 imposed, and which involves an identified victim whose whereabouts “ and inserting in place 
thereof the following words:- a victim as defined by chapter 258B.  
SECTION 12. Said Section 4B of said chapter 279, as so appearing, is hereby further 
amended by inserting after the fourth paragraph the following paragraph:-  
The court shall consider said victim impact statement in disposition of the case against 
the defendant.  
SECTION 13. There shall be a bail notification special commission established pursuant 
to section 2A of chapter 4 of the General Laws, referred to in this section as the commission. The 
commission shall evaluate policies and procedures related to the current bail system and 
recommend improvements or changes related to notification services, pursuant to section 3(t) of 
chapter 258B, for victims and family members of crime, as defined by chapter 258B.  
(a) The commission shall consist of no more than 11 members: 1 of whom shall be the 
executive director of the Massachusetts office for victim assistance or designee, whom shall 
serve as chair; 1 of whom shall be a member of the house of representatives appointed by the 
speaker of the house of representatives; 1 of whom shall be a member of the senate appointed by 
the president of the senate; 1 of whom shall be the chief justice of the trial court or designee; 1 of 
whom shall be the secretary of the executive office of public safety and security or designee; 1 of 
whom shall be the commissioner of probation service or designee; 1 of whom shall be the 
president of the Massachusetts chiefs of police association or designee; 1 of whom shall be the 
president of the Massachusetts sheriffs association or designee; 1 of whom shall be the president 
of the Massachusetts district attorneys association or designee; and no more than 2 of whom 
shall be crime victims appointed by the victim and witness assistance board.  

of 6 96  (b) The commission shall submit its final report to the governor, the house and senate 
chairs of the joint committee on the judiciary and the house and senate chairs of the joint 
committee on public safety and homeland security not later than December 31, 2026 which shall 
include: (i) an evaluation of the current practices relative to bail notification to victims and 
100 family members when an offender is released from custody; (ii) an evaluation of what shall 
101 constitute appropriate notification to victims and family members and the best practice in which 
102 to provide notification (iii) a policy recommendation to ensure appropriate notification services 
103 are provided to victims and family members dependent on the custodial authority in which an 
104 offender is held; (iv) any proposed technology or multi-disciplinary system recommendations to 
105 provide notification services, including contracting with state or non-state entities to develop 
106 implementation plans and estimated costs to the commonwealth; and (v) any additional proposed 
107 policy, regulatory, or statutory changes concerning notification services for victims and family 
108 members within the pretrial system.